Utah, session 2026, HB171.
Section 1. Section 26B-4-301 is amended to read:26B-4-301. Definitions.As used in this part:(1)"Bureau" means the Bureau of Emergency Medical Services created in Section 53-2d-102.(2)"Committee" means the Primary Care Grant Committee described in Section 26B-1-410.(3)"Community based organization":(a)means a private entity; and(b)includes for profit and not for profit entities.(4)"Cultural competence" means a set of congruent behaviors, attitudes, and policies that come together in a system, agency, or profession and enables that system, agency, or profession to work effectively in cross-cultural situations.(5)"Health literacy" means the degree to which an individual has the capacity to obtain, process, and understand health information and services needed to make appropriate health decisions.(6)"Institutional capacity" means the ability of a community based organization to implement public and private contracts.(7)"Medically underserved population" means the population of an urban or rural area or a population group that the committee determines has a shortage of primary health care.(8)"Pregnancy support services" means services that:(a)encourage childbirth instead of voluntary termination of pregnancy; and(b)assist pregnant women, or women who may become pregnant, to choose childbirth whether they intend to parent or select adoption for the child.(9)"Primary care grant" means a grant awarded by the department under Subsection 26B-4-310(1).(10)(a)"Primary health care" means:(i)basic and general health care services given when a person seeks assistance to screen for or to prevent illness and disease, or for simple and common illnesses and injuries; and(ii)care given for the management of chronic diseases.(b)"Primary health care" includes:(i)services of physicians, nurses, physician'sphysician assistants, physical therapists, and dentists licensed to practice in this state under Title 58, Occupations and Professions;(ii)diagnostic and radiologic services;(iii)preventive health services including perinatal services, well-child services, and other services that seek to prevent injury, disease, or the consequences of injury or disease;(iv)emergency medical services;(v)preventive dental services; and(vi)pharmaceutical services.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 31A-22-624 is amended to read:31A-22-624. Primary care physician, physician assistant, or physical therapist.(1)An accident and health insurance policy that requires an insured to select a primary care provider or physician to receive optimum coverage shall permit an insured to select a participating provider who is:(a)(i)an obstetrician;(ii)a gynecologist;(iii)a pediatrician; or(iv)a physician assistant who works with a physician:has trained in a primary care physician's office and completed the physician assistant's collaboration requirement described in Section 58-70a-307; and(A)providing primary care; or(B)described in Subsection (1)(a)(i), (ii), or (iii); and(b)qualified and willing to provide primary care services, as defined by the health care plan, as the insured's provider from whom primary care services are received.(2)Subject to Subsection (5), an accident and health insurance policy that requires an insured to select a primary care provider or physician to receive optimum coverage may permit an insured to select a participating provider who is a physical therapist to provide physical therapy services.(3)An accident and health insurance policy shall clearly state in literature explaining the policy the options available to insureds under Subsections (1) and (2).(4)An accident and health insurance policy may not impose a higher premium, higher copayment requirement, or any other additional expense on an insured because the insured selected a primary care physician in accordance with this section.(5)Notwithstanding Subsection (2), nothing in this section permits a physical therapist to practice physical therapy outside of the physical therapist's scope of practice under Title 58, Chapter 24b, Physical Therapy Practice Act.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.